New York, session 2025-2026, A5086.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13 of chapter 18 of the laws of 2020 authorizing 2 the commissioner of education, in consultation with the comptroller to 3 appoint a monitor to oversee the Wyandanch union free school district 4 and establishing the powers and duties of the monitor, is amended to 5 read as follows: 6 § 13. This act shall take effect immediately, provided however: 7 Section one of this act shall take effect on the same date as a chap- 8 ter of the laws of 2019, authorizing the commissioner of education, in 9 consultation with the comptroller to appoint a monitor to oversee the 10 Wyandanch union free school district and establishing the powers and 11 duties of the monitor, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S.6588-A 12 and A.8422-A, takes effect. 13 Sections three through ten of this act shall expire and be deemed 14 repealed June 30, [2025] 2030. 15 Section eleven shall expire and be deemed repealed June 30 of the last 16 fiscal year during which serial bonds or bonds issued to refund such 17 serial bonds that are outstanding pursuant to such section of this act, 18 provided that the superintendent of the Wyandanch union free school 19 district shall notify the legislative bill drafting commission upon such 20 occurrence in order that the commission may maintain an accurate and 21 timely effective data base of the official text of the laws of the state EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02768-01-5 A. 5086 2 1 of New York in furtherance of effectuating the provisions of section 44 2 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the public officers law. 3 Sections two and twelve of this act shall expire and be deemed 4 repealed June 30, 2049. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.